New York, session 2025-2026, A9288.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs b and c of subdivision 2 of section 159 of the 2 civil service law, as amended by chapter 1028 of the laws of 1981, are 3 amended and a new paragraph d is added to read as follows: 4 b. The benefits provided thereby may be made available to state offi- 5 cers and employees in the division of military and naval affairs in the 6 executive department; [and] 7 c. Unless any group insurance or mass merchandising policy or program 8 offered pursuant to this section is funded by payroll deductions in 9 accordance with subdivision three of section two hundred one of the 10 state finance law, such policy or program shall be funded by specific 11 appropriation of monies of the state, provided, however, both payroll 12 deductions and state appropriations may be utilized to fund any such 13 policy or program[.]; and 14 d. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any state employee who 15 is eligible for group insurance under this section shall receive sick 16 leave accrual benefits at the rate of one day per biweekly payroll peri- 17 od and shall be eligible to accrue two hundred twenty-five days of sick 18 leave. Such employees shall be eligible to be granted and use sick 19 leave at half-pay upon the exhaustion of their sick leave accruals. The 20 cumulative total of all sick leave at half-pay granted to an eligible 21 employee may not exceed one payroll period for each six months of 22 completed state service. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 24 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14126-01-5